test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-taa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - táa - eat ok : #
     táa+V+Inf: táa
     táa+V+Neg: táaqang
     táa+V+Hab: táagang
     táa+V+3Pl: táaqwaa
     táa+V+Prs: táagang
     táa+V+DPast: táagan
     táa+V+PHab: táagiinii
     táa+V+SFut: táasaang
     táa+V+PlCmd: táaquu
     táa+V+IncCmd: táatsqan
     táa+V+Evid: táagaa
     táa+V+IPast: táagaan

     táa+V+Neg+Prs: táaqanggang
     táa+V+Neg+DPast: táaqanggan
     táa+V+Neg+PHab: táaqanggiinii
     táa+V+Neg+SFut: táaqangsaang
     táa+V+Neg+PlCmd: táaqangquu
     táa+V+Neg+IncCmd: táaqangtsqan
     táa+V+Neg+Evid: táaqaangaa
     táa+V+Neg+IPast: táaqaangaan

     táa+V+Hab+Prs: táaganggang
     táa+V+Hab+SFut: táagangsaang
     táa+V+Hab+Evid: táagaangaa
     táa+V+Hab+IPast: táagaangaan

     táa+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: táagangqanggang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+SFut: táagangqangsaang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+Evid: táaqanggaangaa
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+IPast: táaqanggaangaan

     táa+V+3Pl+Prs: táaqwaang
     táa+V+3Pl+DPast: táaqwägan
     táa+V+3Pl+PHab: táaqwägiinii
     táa+V+3Pl+SFut: táaqwaasaang
     táa+V+3Pl+Evid: táaqaawaa
     táa+V+3Pl+IPast: táaqaawaan

     táa+V+Neg+3Pl: táaqangqwaa
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+Prs: táaqangqwaang
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+DPast: táaqangqwägan
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+PHab: táaqangqwägiinii
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+SFut: táaqangqwaasaang
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+Evid: táaqangqaawaa
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+IPast: táaqangqaawaan

     táa+V+Hab+3Pl: táagangqwaa
     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+Prs: táagangqwaang
     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+SFut: táagangqwaasaang
     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+Evid: táaqwägaangaa
     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+IPast: táaqwägaangaan

     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl: táagangqangqwaa
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+Prs: táagangqangqwaang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+SFut: táagangqangqwaasaang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+Evid: táaqangqwägaangaa
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+IPast: táaqangqwägaangaan
     
     táa+V+NFut: táaqang khasaqáang
     táa+V+IFut: táaqang khasaasdláang
     
     táa+V+Neg+NFut: táaqang khasaaqánggang
     táa+V+Neg+IFut: táaqang khasaasdläqánggang

     táa+V+Hab+NFut: táagangang khasaqáang
     táa+V+Hab+IFut: táagangang khasaasdláang

     táa+V+Hab+Neg+NFut: táagangang khasaaqánggang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+IFut: táagangang khasaasdläqánggang

     táa+V+3Pl+NFut: táaqwaaqang khasaqáang
     táa+V+3Pl+IFut: táaqwaaqang khasaasdláang

     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+NFut: táaqwaaqang khasaaqánggang
     táa+V+Neg+3Pl+IFut: táaqwaaqang khasaasdläqánggang

     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+NFut: táagangqwaaqang khasaqáang
     táa+V+Hab+3Pl+IFut: táagangqwaaqang khasaasdláang

     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+NFut: táagangqwaaqang khasaaqánggang
     táa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+IFut: táagangqwaaqang khasaasdläqánggang
